test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kerres_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - ǩeʹrres e-stem ahkio: # Noun - full paradigm
     ǩeʹrres+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: ǩeʹrres
     ǩeʹrres+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: ǩeʹrrez
     ǩeʹrres+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: ǩeʹrrez
     ǩeʹrres+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: ǩeʹrrsa
     ǩeʹrres+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: ǩeʹrrsest
     ǩeʹrres+N+Sg+Com+Indef: ǩeʹrrsin
     ǩeʹrres+N+Ess+Indef: ǩeʹrrsen
     ǩeʹrres+N+Par+Indef: ǩeʹrrsed
     ǩeʹrres+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [ǩeʹrreztaa, ǩeʹrreztää]
     ǩeʹrres+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: ǩeʹrrez
     ǩeʹrres+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: ǩeʹrrsi
     ǩeʹrres+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: ǩeʹrrsid
     ǩeʹrres+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: ǩeʹrrsid
     ǩeʹrres+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: ǩeʹrrsin
     ǩeʹrres+N+Pl+Com+Indef: ǩeʹrrsivuiʹm
     ǩeʹrres+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [ǩeʹrrsitaa, ǩeʹrrsitää]
